Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 851, is
amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 15926 Page 1

Section 851. The Local Development Act shall serve to implement
and execute Section 6C of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution as
approved by the voters of the State of Oklahoma on November 6, 1990,
by:
1. Providing for the granting of incentives and exemptions from
taxation within certain areas, placing restrictions thereon, and
limiting the time period for the exemptions, as authorized by
subsection A thereof;
2. Providing for apportionment of an increment of local taxes
and fees, placing restrictions thereon, and limiting the time period
for the apportionment, as authorized by subsection B thereof; and
3. Providing for the planning, financing, and carrying out of
development and redevelopment within certain areas, as authorized by
subsection C thereof.
Nothing in the Local Development Act shall be construed in a
manner contrary to or inconsistent with the provisions of said
constitutional provision.
The Legislature hereby finds that historic preservation,
reinvestment or enterprise areas as defined under this act are
unproductive, undeveloped, or underdeveloped or blighted areas
pursuant to subsection C of Section 6 of Article X of the Oklahoma
Constitution.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 853, is
amended to read as follows:
Req. No. 15926 Page 2

Section 853. As used in Section 850 et seq. of this title:
1. "Apportionment" means the direction by a governing body,
authorized by the Legislature pursuant to Section 6C of Article X of
the Oklahoma Constitution, to apply all or any portion of an
increment of ad valorem taxes and all or any portion of sales taxes,
other local taxes or local fees, or any combination thereof, to
financing a plan and project in accordance with this act;
2. "Apportionment area" means the same as an increment district
as defined under this act;
3. "Bonds" means evidences of indebtedness, tax apportionment
bonds or other obligations issued by a public entity pursuant to the
provisions of Section 863 of this title to finance project costs,
pursuant to a project plan, which are to be repaid in whole or part
with apportioned increments;
4. "District" means either an incentive district as authorized
by Section 860 of this title or an increment district as authorized
by Section 861 of this title. A district may consist of all or a
portion of a project area;
5. "Enterprise area" means any area within a designated state
or federal enterprise zone;
6. "Enterprise zone" means an enterprise zone as designated by
the Department of Commerce pursuant to the provisions of Section
690.3 of this title or as designated by the federal government;

Req. No. 15926 Page 3

7. "Governing body" means the city council of a city, the board
of trustees of a town or the board of county commissioners;
8. "Historic preservation area" means a geographic area listed
in or nominated by the State Historic Preservation Officer to the
National Register of Historic Places, an historic structure or
structures listed individually in or nominated by the State Historic
Preservation Officer to the National Register of Historic Places,
with such area or structure being subject to historic preservation
zoning, or for purposes of ad valorem tax exemptions provided for in
subsection D of Section 860 of this title, a structure subject to
historic preservation zoning. Rehabilitation undertaken in an
historic preservation area shall meet the Secretary of the
Interior's Standards for Rehabilitation, latest revision, in order
to be eligible for the incentives or exemptions granted pursuant to
Section 860 of this title;
9. "Increment" means that portion of ad valorem taxes in excess
of the amount of that portion of the taxes which are produced by the
levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each such ad valorem
taxing entity upon the base assessed value of the district or as to
an area later added to the district, the effective date of the
modification of the plan, or that portion of sales taxes, other
local taxes or local fees collected each year reasonably determined
by a formula approved by the governing body to be generated by the
project, regardless of taxable location or recipient local public
Req. No. 15926 Page 4

taxi ng entity, which may be apportioned for specific project costs
or as a specific revenue source for other public entities in the
area in which the project costs take place;
10. "Local taxes" means ad valorem taxes, sales taxes and other
local taxes which are levied by or on the behalf of a taxing entity;
11. "Planning commission" means an organization established for
local planning by local government or governments in accordance with
the laws of this state;
12. "Project" means all development activities pursuant to the
objectives of the project plan;
13. "Project area" means the geographic boundaries within which
development activities will occur. The project area may be
coextensive or larger than the increment district;
14. "Project costs" means the expenditures made or estimated to
be made and monetary obligations incurred or estimated to be
incurred which are listed in the project plan as costs of and
incidental to planning, approval and implementation of the project
plan. Any income, special assessments, or other revenues received,
or reasonably expected to be received, by the city, town or county
in connection with the implementation of the project plan may be
used to pay project costs. Project costs include, but are not
limited to:
a. capital costs, including the actual costs of the
acquisition and construction of public works, public
Req. No. 15926 Page 5

improvements, new public or private buildings,
structures, and fixtures; the actual costs of the
acquisition, demolition, alteration, remodeling,
repair, or reconstruction of existing public or
private buildings, structures, and fixtures; and the
actual costs of the acquisition of land and equipment
for public works, public improvements and public
buildings and the actual costs of clearing and grading
of such land and environmental remediation related
thereto,
b. financing costs, including interest paid to holders of
evidences of indebtedness or other obligations issued
to pay for project costs and premium paid over the
principal amount of the obligations because of the
redemption of the obligations before maturity,
c. real property assembly costs, including clearance and
preparation costs,
d. professional service costs, including those incurred
for architectural, planning, engineering, legal and
financial advice and services,
e. direct administrative costs, including reasonable
charges for the time spent by employees of the city,
town or county in connection with the implementation
of a project plan or employees of private entities
Req. No. 15926 Page 6

under contract with a public entity for project
planning or implementation,
f. organizational costs, including the costs of
conducting environmental impact studies or other
impact studies, the cost of publicizing the
consideration of the project plan, costs incidental to
creation of the district, and the cost of implementing
the project plan for the district,
g. interest, before and during construction and for two
(2) years after completion of construction, whether or
not capitalized,
h. fees for bond guarantees, letters of credit and bond
insurance,
i. the amount of any contributions offset made in
connection with the implementation of the project
plan,
j. the costs for determining or redetermining the base
assessed value of a district,
k. costs of construction of public works or improvements,
including but not limited to highways, roads, streets,
bridges, sewers, traffic control systems and devices,
telecommunications systems, parks, water distribution
and supply systems, curbing, sidewalks and any similar
public improvements, common utility or service
Req. No. 15926 Page 7

facilities, landscaping, parking, and water
detention/retention systems,
l. all or a portion of another taxing jurisdiction's
capital costs resulting from the development or
redevelopment project necessarily incurred or to be
incurred in furtherance of the objectives of the plan
and project, to the extent the governing body by
written agreement accepts and approves such costs,
m. relocation costs to the extent that a governing body
determines that relocation costs shall be paid or are
required to be paid by federal or state law,
n. all costs incurred in the maintenance, management,
marketing and other services provided through an
active Main Street Program recognized as such by the
Oklahoma Department of Commerce, and
o. assistance in development financing to the extent the
governing body approves such financing;
15. "Project plan" means the approved plans of a city, town or
county which may include a designated district or districts under
this act in conformance with its comprehensive plan, which is
intended by the payment of costs through apportionment of the
increment or by the granting of incentives or exemptions to reduce
or eliminate those conditions, the existence of which qualified the
district, and to thereby enhance private investment of the tax bases
Req. No. 15926 Page 8

of t he taxing entities which extend into the district. Project
plans may be a part of and incorporate existing neighborhood,
renewal, economic development, public school and other such plans.
Each project plan shall conform to the requirements specified by
this act;
16. "Public entity" means any city, town, county, board,
commission, authority, district, urban renewal authority or public
trust;
17. "Reinvestment area" means any area located within the
limits of a city, town or county requiring public improvements,
including but not limited to transportation-related projects
identified by any transportation authority pursuant to Section
1370.7 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to reverse economic
stagnation or decline, to serve as a catalyst for retaining or
expanding employment, to attract major investment in the area or to
preserve or enhance the tax base or in which fifty percent (50%) or
more of the structures in the area have an age of thirty-five (35)
years or more. Such an area is detrimental to the public health,
safety, morals or welfare. Such an area may become a blighted an
underdeveloped area because of any one or more of the following
factors: dilapidation; obsolescence; deterioration; illegal use of
individual structures; presence of structures below minimum code
standards; abandonment; excessive vacancies; overcrowding of
structures and community facilities; lack of ventilation, light or
Req. No. 15926 Page 9

sani tary facilities; inadequate utilities; excessive land coverage;
deleterious land use or layout; depreciation of physical
maintenance; and lack of community planning. Such an area includes
a blighted area as defined in Section 38-101 of Title 11 of the
Oklahoma Statutes at the time of approval of the project plan; and
18. "Taxing entity" or "taxing jurisdiction" means a city,
town, county, school district, political subdivision or other local
entity in which local taxes or fees are levied by or on its behalf.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 855, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 855. A. Prior to the adoption and approval of a
project plan and the ordinance or resolution required under Section
856 of this title and prior to the public hearing required under
Section 859 of this title, the governing body shall appoint a review
committee to review and make a recommendation concerning the
proposed district, plan or project. The membership of the review
committee shall consist of the following: a representative of the
governing body who shall serve as chairperson; a representative of
the planning commission having jurisdiction over the proposed
district; a representative designated by each taxing jurisdiction
within the proposed district whose ad valorem taxes might be
impacted according to the plan; and three members representing the
public at large and selected by the other committee members from a
list of seven names submitted by the chairperson of the review
Req. No. 15926 Page 10

comm ittee; provided, at least one of the members representing the
public at large shall be a representative of the business community
in the city, town, or county considering the proposed plan and
project, and if a proposed plan objective is development of
principally commercial retail, such representative shall be either a
retailer or a representative of a retail organization.
B. The review committee shall consider and make its findings
and recommendations to the governing body with respect to the
conditions establishing the eligibility of the proposed district.
The review committee recommendations shall include the analysis used
to project revenues over the life of the project plan, the effect on
the taxing entities and the appropriateness of the approval of the
proposed plan and project. The review committee may recommend that
the project plan be approved, denied or approved subject to
conditions set forth by the committee.
C. Prior to approval by the governing body, the review
committee shall consider and determine whether the proposed plan and
project will have a financial impact on any taxing jurisdiction and
business activities within the proposed district and shall report
its findings to the governing body. Such considerations shall be
concurrent with or subsequent to the review and consideration of the
committee provided for in subsection B of this section. The
approval of any district plan or project by the governing body shall
address any findings of such impact by the review committee.
Req. No. 15926 Page 11

D. In the event of any changes in the area to be included in
the proposed district or any substantial changes in the proposed
plan and project or for any other reason deemed appropriate by the
governing body, the review committee shall consider and may modify
its findings and recommendations made pursuant to the provisions of
subsection B of this section.
E. Approval of the proposed district or the proposed plan or
project by the governing body which is in accord with the
recommendation of the review committee shall be by a majority vote
of the governing body. Such approval which is not in accord with
the recommendations and/or conditions set forth by the review
committee shall be by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote voters of the
applicable jurisdiction. If the district, plan or project is
sponsored by a county, the question for creation of the district,
plan or project shall be submitted to a vote of the eligible voters
of the county. If the district, plan or project is sponsored by a
city or town, the question for creation of the district, plan or
project shall be submitted to a vote of the eligible voters of the
applicable city or town. No district, plan or project shall be
created or approved unless a majority of the eligible voters voting
on such question as provided by this subsection approve the creation
of the district. Any local taxing jurisdiction that does not
separately approve the formation of an increment district shall not

Req. No. 15926 Page 12

be i ncluded in the district and its tax revenues shall not be
apportioned for use by an increment district.
F. Meetings of the review committee shall be subject to the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act. Any information relating to the
marketing plans, financial statements, trade secrets or any other
proprietary information submitted to the review committee by a
person or entity seeking adoption and approval of a proposed
district, plan or project shall be confidential, except to the
extent that the person or entity which provided the information
consents to disclosure. Executive sessions may be held to discuss
such information if deemed necessary by the review committee.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 855.1-A of Title 62, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No member of a review committee shall accept anything of
value from a person, firm, partnership, limited partnership, limited
liability partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or
other legal entity that would benefit, directly or indirectly, from
the formation of an incentive district or an increment district.
B. No member of a review committee shall accept anything of
value from any person or legal entity acting on behalf of an entity
described in subsection A of this section.
C. Before a review committee votes to recommend the creation of
an incentive district or increment district pursuant to the
Req. No. 15926 Page 13

prov isions of the Local Development Act, each member of the
committee shall be required to complete at least twelve (12) hours
of instruction which includes the provisions of the Local
Development Act, applicable concepts related to the utilization of
sales tax revenue or other locally authorized revenues, including ad
valorem tax revenue, in either an incentive district or an increment
district. The provider for the instruction shall issue a
certificate of completion to a person who successfully completes the
course of instruction required by this subsection.
D. A review committee shall be required to meet at least once
each calendar year.
E. Before a review committee makes a recommendation to the
applicable governing body for the creation of an incentive district
or an increment district, the review committee shall call for a
presentation in support of the decision and a presentation in
opposition to the decision.
F. Before a review committee makes a recommendation to the
applicable governing body related to the formation of an incentive
district or an increment district, the review committee shall obtain
the professional opinion of such legal and financial advisors as the
committee may select to evaluate the proposal. No person or firm
providing advice to either the applicable governing body or to any
legal entity described in subsection A of this section shall be

Req. No. 15926 Page 14

elig ible to provide advice to the review committee pursuant to the
provisions of this subsection.
G. Before a review committee makes any recommendation to a
governing body related to the formation of an incentive district or
an increment district, the review committee shall be provided with
the following information related to each and every for-profit
business enterprise as described in subsection A of this section:
1. Whether the equity interest of the entity is traded publicly
and if so, the market in or upon which the equity securities are
listed for purposes of trading;
2. Whether the legal entity is formed pursuant to the laws of a
state of the United States or if not, the jurisdiction pursuant to
the laws of which the legal entity is organized or authorized to do
business;
3. The North American Industry Classification Code, with
sufficient specificity to identify the actual business activity to
be conducted, for the business enterprise, inclusive of any and all
business activity that would be conducted within the boundary of an
incentive district or an increment district;
4. Whether the legal entity pursues or has adopted
environmental, social, or governance policies that are inconsistent
with profit maximization; and
5. Whether the legal entity pursues or has adopted diversity,
equity, or inclusion policies.
Req. No. 15926 Page 15

H. Before a review committee makes any recommendation to a
governing body related to the formation of an incentive district or
an increment district, the review committee shall prepare or have a
qualified third party prepare an economic impact study which shall
include the effect of any apportioned tax revenues on local taxing
jurisdictions, the economic effects likely to occur as a result of
the completion of the project and such other information as the
review committee may determine to be relevant.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15926 MAH 01/14/26













Req. No. 15926 Page 16